Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1110
Qualified domestic relations order; how determined; procedure.

(1) The Public Employees Retirement Board, or the board's designee, shall determine, within a reasonable period of time after receiving a domestic relations order, if the order is a qualified domestic relations order under the Spousal Pension Rights Act. The board may determine that an order is not qualified for the following reasons:

(a) The order fails to fulfill all the requirements under section 42-1103;

(b) The order requires the board to act contrary to the statutory provisions of the statewide public retirement system; or

(c) The order requires payment to the alternate payee in the form of a joint and survivor annuity with respect to the alternate payee and his or her subsequent spouse.

(2) Failure to file an order within ninety days after its entry shall not be the basis for determining that an order is not a qualified domestic relations order.

(3) Within seven days after making the determination, the board or its designee shall notify the alternate payee and the member whether the domestic relations order is a qualified domestic relation order under the act. If the order is not a qualified domestic relations order, the notice shall specify the basis for such determination.

(4) A determination by the board or its designee that a domestic relations order is not a qualified domestic relations order does not prohibit a member or an alternate payee from filing an amended order with the board.

Laws 1996, LB 1273, § 10.